Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.680

Residential real property information and borrower personal information.

Information obtained by the department of commerce under RCW 61.24.190 that reveals the name or other personal information of the borrower or the street address of the residential real property on which a notice of default was issued is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2021 c 151 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 151 ss 5, 9, 11, and 12: See note following RCW 61.24.135.

Findings—Intent—2021 c 151: See note following RCW 61.24.005.